Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB17.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1511 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1511. Subjects of Instruction; Flag Code.--In every elementary public and private school, established and maintained in this Commonwealth, the following subjects shall be taught, in the English language and from English texts: English, including spelling, reading [and], writing, including print, joined italics and cursive handwriting, arithmetic, geography, the history of the United States and of Pennsylvania, civics, including loyalty to the State and National Government, safety 12345678910111213141516171819 education, and the humane treatment of birds and animals, health, including physical education, and physiology, music and art. Other subjects shall be taught in the public elementary schools and also in the public high schools as may be prescribed by the standards of the State Board of Education. All such subjects, except foreign languages, shall be taught in the English language and from English texts: Provided, however, That, at the discretion of the [Superintendent of Public Instruction] Secretary of Education, the teaching of subjects in a language other than English may be permitted as part of a sequence in foreign language study or as part of a bilingual education program if the teaching personnel are properly certified in the subject fields. Each school district shall provide and distribute to each pupil, enrolled in the eighth grade of the public schools, one illustrated copy of the National Flag Code, and shall, from time to time, make available such copies as are necessary for replacements from year to year. It shall be the duty of each teacher in the public schools to make such use of the code as may, from time to time, seem proper.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0017PN0002 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021